it: Salute e bellezza > Cura della persona > Igiene orale > Accessori per spazzolini: Batterie dello spazzolino; Caricabatterie dello spazzolino; Protezioni per spazzolini da denti; Testine ricambio spazzolini; Igienizzanti spazzolini; Custodie da viaggio per spazzolini; Timer per lavarsi i denti
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Personlig vård > Munvård > Tillbehör till tandborstar: Tandborstbatterier; Tandborstladdare; Tandborstskydd; Ersättningshuvuden för tandborstar; Tandborstrengörare; Resefodral för tandborstar; Tandborstningstimer
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Osobna njega > Njega usne šupljine > Dodaci za četkice za zube: Baterije za četkice za zube; Punjači za četkice za zube; Zaštitne kapice za četkice za zube; Zamjenske glave četkica za zube; Sredstva za dezinfekciju četkica za zube; Putne kutijice za četkice za zube; Tajmeri za pranje zubi
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados pessoais > Cuidados bucais > Acessórios para escova de dente: Baterias para escova de dentes; Carregadores para escova de dentes; Capas para escovas de dente; Cabeças de reposição para escovas de dente; Desinfetantes para escovas de dente; Estojos de viagem para escova de dentes; Temporizadores de escovação
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Osebna nega > Ustna higiena > Dodatki za zobne ščetke: Baterije za zobne ščetke; Polnilci za zobne ščetke; Pokrovi za zobne ščetke; Nadomestne glave za zobne ščetke; Razkužila za zobne ščetke; Potovalni etuiji za zobne ščetke; Časomeri za ščetkanje zob
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Higiena osobista > Higiena jamy ustnej > Akcesoria do szczoteczek do zębów: Baterie do szczoteczek do zębów; Ładowarki do szczoteczek do zębów; Osłony na szczoteczki do zębów; Końcówki do szczoteczek do zębów; Sterylizatory do szczoteczek do zębów; Etui podróżne na szczoteczki do zębów; Minutniki do szczotkowania zębów
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 個人保養 > 口腔保健 > 電動牙刷配件: 牙刷電池; 牙刷充電器; 牙刷護套; 替換牙刷頭; 牙刷殺菌器; 牙刷旅行盒; 刷牙計時器
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Sản phẩm chăm sóc cá nhân > Chăm sóc răng miệng > Phụ kiện bàn chải đánh răng: Pin bàn chải đánh răng; Bộ sạc bàn chải đánh răng; Nắp đậy và hộp đựng bàn chải; Đầu bàn chải đánh răng thay thế; Dụng cụ làm sạch bàn chải đánh răng; Hộp đựng bàn chải du lịch; Đồng hồ hẹn giờ đánh răng
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Körperpflege > Mundpflege > Zahnbürstenzubehör: Zahnbürstenbatterien; Zahnbürstenladegeräte; Zahnbürstenhüllen; Ersatzköpfe für Zahnbürsten; Zahnbürstendesinfektionsmittel; Zahnbürsten-Reiseetuis; Zahnputztimer
ko: 건강/미용 > 개인 미용/위생 용품 > 구강 관리 > 칫솔 부대용품: 칫솔 배터리; 칫솔 충전기; 칫솔캡; 칫솔 교체용 헤드; 칫솔 살균기; 칫솔 여행용 케이스; 칫솔질 타이머
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Osobná starostlivosť > Starostlivosť o ústnu dutinu > Príslušenstvo k zubným kefkám: Batérie do zubných kefiek; Nabíjačky zubných kefiek; Obaly na zubné kefky; Náhradné hlavice na zubnú kefku; Dezinfekčné prostriedky na zubnú kefku; Cestovné puzdrá na zubné kefky; Časovače čistenia zubov
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 个人护理 > 口腔护理 > 牙刷配件: 牙刷电池; 牙刷充电器; 牙刷盒; 备用牙刷头; 牙刷消毒器; 牙刷旅行盒; 刷牙计时器
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Προσωπική φροντίδα > Στοματική φροντίδα > Αξεσουάρ οδοντόβουρτσας: Μπαταρίες οδοντόβουρτσας; Φορτιστές οδοντόβουρτσας; Καλύμματα οδοντόβουρτσας; Ανταλλακτικές κεφαλές οδοντόβουρτσας; Απολυμαντικά οδοντόβουρτσας; Θήκες ταξιδιού οδοντόβουρτσας; Χρονόμετρα βουρτσίσματος
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลส่วนบุคคล > การดูแลปาก > อุปกรณ์แปรงสีฟัน: แบตเตอรี่แปรงสีฟัน; อุปกรณ์ชาร์จแปรงสีฟัน; กล่องเก็บแปรงสีฟันแบบพกพา; อะไหล่ส่วนหัวของแปรงสีฟัน; ที่ฆ่าเชื้อโรคสำหรับแปรงสีฟัน; กระเป๋าใส่แปรงสีฟันสำหรับเดินทาง; ตัวจับเวลาแปรงสีฟัน
ru: Красота и здоровье > Личная гигиена и уход за собой > Уход за полостью рта > Аксессуары для зубных щеток: Батарейки для зубных щеток; Зарядные устройства для зубных щеток; Колпачки для зубных щеток; Сменные насадки для зубных щеток; Стерилизаторы зубных щеток; Дорожные футляры для зубных щеток; Таймеры для чистки зубов
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Asmeninė priežiūra > Burnos priežiūra > Dantų šepetėlių priedai: Dantų šepetėlių baterijos; Dantų šepetėlių įkrovikliai; Dantų šepetėlių dangteliai; Dantų šepetėlių atsarginės galvutės; Dantų šepetėlių dezinfekavimo priemonės; Dantų šepetėlių kelioniniai dėklai; Dantų valymo laikmačiai
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Persoonlijke verzorging > Mondverzorging > Tandenborstelaccessoires: Tandenborstel batterijen; Tandenborstel opladers; Tandenborstelhoesjes; Vervangende opzetstukken voor tandenborstels; Schoonmaakmiddelen voor tandenborstels; Tandenborstel reis hoezen; Tandenpoets timers
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado personal > Cuidado bucal > Accesorios para cepillos de dientes: Baterías de cepillo de dientes; Cargadores de cepillo de dientes; Fundas para cepillos de dientes; Cabezales de repuesto para cepillos de dientes; Desinfectantes para cepillos de dientes; Estuches de viaje de cepillo de dientes; Temporizadores de cepillado de dientes
fr: Santé et beauté > Hygiène personnelle > Soins buccaux > Accessoires de brosses à dents: Piles pour brosses à dents; Chargeurs pour brosses à dents; Étuis pour brosses à dents; Brossettes de rechange; Assainisseurs pour brosses à dents; Étuis de voyage pour brosses à dents; Minuteurs de brossage
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Kişisel Bakım > Ağız Bakımı > Diş Fırçası Aksesuarları: Diş Fırçası Pilleri; Diş Fırçası Şarj Cihazları; Diş Fırçası Kutuları; Diş Fırçası Yedek Başları; Diş Fırçası Sterilizatörleri; Diş Fırçası Seyahat Kutuları; Diş Fırçalama Zamanlayıcıları
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Personlig pleje > Mundpleje > Tilbehør til tandbørster: Tandbørstebatterier; Tandbørste-opladere; Hylstre til tandbørster; Udskiftelige hoveder til tandbørster; Sterilisering til tandbørster; Tandbørste-rejseetuier; Tandbørste-timere
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijire personală > Îngrijire orală > Accesorii pentru periuța de dinți: Baterii pentru periuțe de dinți; Încărcătoare pentru periuțe de dinți; Capace pentru periuța de dinți; Capete de schimb pentru periuța de dinți; Dezinfectante pentru periuța de dinți; Cutii de călătorie pentru periuțe de dinți; Cronometre pentru periaj
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Personlig pleie > Tannpleie > Tilbehør til tannbørster: Tannbørstebatterier; Tannbørste ladere; Tannbørstedeksler; Erstatningshoder for tannbørster; Rensemidler for tannbørster; Tannbørste reiseetuier; Tannpusstimere
hu: Egészség és szépség > Személyes gondoskodás > Szájápolás > Fogkefe-kiegészítők: Fogkefeelemek; Fogkefetöltők; Fogkefe-huzatok; Fogkefecserefejek; Fogkefe-fertőtlenítők; Fogkefe-útitokok; Fogmosási időzítők
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidado pessoal > Cuidado oral > Acessórios de escovas: Pilhas para escovas de dentes; Carregadores para escovas de dentes; Tampas de escovas de dentes; Cabeças de substituição de escovas de dentes; Antisséticos de escovas de dentes; Estojos de viagem para escovas de dentes; Temporizadores de escovagem
en: Health & Beauty > Personal Care > Oral Care > Toothbrush Accessories: Toothbrush Batteries; Toothbrush Chargers; Toothbrush Covers; Toothbrush Replacement Heads; Toothbrush Sanitizers; Toothbrush Travel Cases; Toothbrushing Timers
cs: Zdraví a krása > Osobní péče > Péče o ústní dutinu > Zubní kartáčky – příslušenství: Baterie do kartáčků na zuby; Nabíječky na kartáčky na zuby; Kryty na zubní kartáčky; Náhradní hlavice pro zubní kartáčky; Dezinfekce na zubní kartáčky; Cestovní pouzdra na kartáčky na zuby; Časovače čištění zubů
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Лична грижа > Орална грижа > Аксесоари за четки за зъби: Батерии за четка за зъби; Зарядни за четка за зъби; Калъфи за четки за зъби; Резервни глави за четки за зъби; Дезинфектанти за четки за зъби; Пътни калъфи за четка за зъби; Таймери за миене на зъби
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Henkilökohtainen hygienia > Suunhoito > Hammasharjan lisätarvikkeet: Hammasharjaparisto; Hammasharjalaturi; Hammasharjakotelot; Hammasharjan vaihtopäät; Hammasharjan desinfiointi; Hammasharjan matkakotelo; Hammasharjan ajastin
ja: 美容・健康 > 衛生日用品 > 口腔ケア > 歯ブラシ用品: 歯ブラシ用電池; 歯ブラシ充電器; 歯ブラシカバー; 歯ブラシ用替えブラシ; 歯ブラシ除菌器; 歯ブラシ携帯ケース; 歯磨きタイマー